test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-poyo_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - поʼ: # Noun 'distance, period' - partial paradigm /Type 28/
     поʼ+N+Sg+Nom: поʼ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Acc: поймʼ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Gen: пойʼ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Dat: пондʼ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Loc: [поӈгана, поӈгна]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Abl: поӈгад
     поʼ+N+Sg+Pros: помна
     поʼ+N+Du+Nom: поӈгʼ
     поʼ+N+Du+Acc: поӈгʼ
     поʼ+N+Du+Gen: поӈгʼ
     поʼ+N+Pl+Nom: пойˮ
     поʼ+N+Pl+Acc: поё
     поʼ+N+Pl+Gen: поёˮ
     поʼ+N+Pl+Dat: поӈгˮ
     поʼ+N+Pl+Loc: [поӈгаˮна, поӈгˮна]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Abl: поӈгат
     поʼ+N+Pl+Pros: поёˮмана
     
     поʼ+N+Tra: поӈэ     
     поʼ+N+Car: понзиˮ
     поʼ+N+Equ: пондремʼ
     поʼ+N+Equ+Lat: пондревʼ

# Possessive forms !Local case forms need to be checked!
     поʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: пом
     поʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: пол  
     поʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: понда 
     поʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: помиʼ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: полиʼ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: пондиʼ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: помаˮ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: полаˮ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: пондоʼ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: пом
     поʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: понд  
     поʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: понда 
     поʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: помиʼ 
     поʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: пондиʼ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: пондиʼ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: помаˮ 
     поʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: пондаˮ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: пондоʼ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [пон, пони] 
     поʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: понд  
     поʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: понда 
     поʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: пониʼ 
     поʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: пондиʼ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: пондиʼ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: понаˮ 
     поʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: пондаˮ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: пондоʼ  
     поʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [поӈган, поӈгани]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: поӈганд  
     поʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: поӈганда 
     поʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: поӈганиʼ 
     поʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: поӈгандиʼ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: поӈгандиʼ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: поӈганаˮ 
     поʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: поӈгандаˮ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: поӈгандоʼ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [поӈганан, поӈгнан]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: [поӈгананд, поӈгнанд]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: [поӈгананда, поӈгнанда]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: [поӈгананиʼ, поӈгнаниʼ]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: [поӈганандиʼ, поӈгнандиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: [поӈганандиʼ, поӈгнандиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: [поӈгананаˮ, поӈгнанаˮ]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: [поӈганандаˮ, поӈгнандаˮ]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: [поӈганандоʼ, поӈгнандоʼ]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [поӈгадан, поӈгдан]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: [поӈгаданд, поӈгданд]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: [поӈгаданда, поӈгданда]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [поӈгаданиʼ, поӈгаданиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: [поӈгадандиʼ, поӈгдандиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: [поӈгадандиʼ, поӈгдандиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [поӈгаданаˮ, поӈгданаˮ]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: [поӈгадандаˮ, поӈгдандаˮ]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: [поӈгадандоʼ, поӈгдандоʼ]
     поʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: помнан
     поʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: помнанд  
     поʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: помнанда 
     поʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: помнаниʼ 
     поʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: помнандиʼ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: помнандиʼ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: помнанаˮ 
     поʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: помнандаˮ
     поʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: помнандоʼ
     поʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [поӈгаюн, поӈгюн]  
     поʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: [поӈгаюд, поӈгюд]
     поʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: [поӈгаюда, поӈгюда]
     поʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: [поӈгаюниʼ, поӈгюниʼ]
     поʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: [поӈгаюдиʼ, поӈгюдиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: [поӈгаюдиʼ, поӈгюдиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: [поӈгаюнаˮ, поӈгюнаˮ]
     поʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: [поӈгаюдаˮ, поӈгюдаˮ]
     поʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: [поӈгаюдоʼ, поӈгюдоʼ]
     поʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [поӈгаюн, поӈгюн]   
     поʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: [поӈгаюд, поӈгюд]
     поʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: [поӈгаюда, поӈгюда]
     поʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: [поӈгаюниʼ, поӈгюниʼ]
     поʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: [поӈгаюдиʼ, поӈгюдиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: [поӈгаюдиʼ, поӈгюдиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: [поӈгаюнаˮ, поӈгюнаˮ]
     поʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: [поӈгаюдаˮ, поӈгюдаˮ]
     поʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: [поӈгаю, поӈгюдоʼ]
     поʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [поӈгаюн, поӈгюн] 
     поʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: [поӈгают, поӈгют]
     поʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: [поӈгаюта, поӈгюта]
     поʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: [поӈгаюниʼ, поӈгюниʼ]
     поʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: [поӈгаютиʼ, поӈгютиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: [поӈгаютиʼ, поӈгютиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: [поӈгаюнаˮ, поӈгюнаˮ]
     поʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: [поӈгаютаˮ, поӈгютаˮ]
     поʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: [поӈгаю, поӈгютоʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: поён 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: поёд   
     поʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: поёда  
     поʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: поёниʼ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: поёдиʼ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: поёдиʼ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: поёнаˮ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: поёдаˮ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: поёдоʼ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: поён   
     поʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: поёд   
     поʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: поёда  
     поʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: поёниʼ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: поёдиʼ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: поёдиʼ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: поёнаˮ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: поёдаˮ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: поёдоʼ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: поёˮн  
     поʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: поёт   
     поʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: поёта  
     поʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: поёˮниʼ
     поʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: поётиʼ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: поётиʼ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: поёˮнаˮ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: поётаˮ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: поётоʼ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: поӈгаˮн 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: поӈгат 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: поӈгата 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: поӈгаˮниʼ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: поӈгатиʼ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: поӈгатиʼ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: поӈгаˮнаˮ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: поӈгатаˮ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: поӈгатоʼ 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [поӈгаˮнан, поӈгˮнан]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: [поӈгаˮнат, поӈгˮнат]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: [поӈгаˮната, поӈгˮната]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: [поӈгаˮнаниʼ, поӈгˮнаниʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: [поӈгаˮнатиʼ, поӈгˮнатиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: [поӈгаˮнатиʼ, поӈгˮнатиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: [поӈгаˮнанаˮ, поӈгˮнанаˮ]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: [поӈгаˮнатаˮ, поӈгˮнатаˮ]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: [поӈгаˮнатоʼ, поӈгˮнатоʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [поӈгатан, поӈгтан]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: [поӈгатат, поӈгтат]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [поӈгатата, поӈгтата]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [поӈгатаниʼ, поӈгтаниʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [поӈгататиʼ, поӈгтатиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [поӈгататиʼ, поӈгтатиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [поӈгатанаˮ, поӈгтанаˮ]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [поӈгататаˮ, поӈгтатаˮ]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [поӈгататоʼ, поӈгтатоʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: поёˮманан  
     поʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: поёˮманат  
     поʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: поёˮманата 
     поʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: поёˮмананиʼ
     поʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: поёˮманатиʼ
     поʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: поёˮманатиʼ
     поʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: поёˮмананаˮ
     поʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: поёˮманатаˮ
     поʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: поёˮманатоʼ

# Predestinative 

     поʼ+N+Pred+Abs: понд
     поʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [пондав, пондув]
     поʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: пондар  
     поʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: [пондада, пондда]
     поʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [пондав, пондув]
     поʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: пондамд
     поʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: [пондамда, пондмда]
     поʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: пондан
     поʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: понданд
     поʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: [понданда, понднда]
     поʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: [пондамиʼ, пондмиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: пондриʼ
     поʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: [пондадиʼ, понддиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: [пондамиʼ, пондмиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: [пондамдиʼ, пондмдиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: [пондамдиʼ, пондмдиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: [понданиʼ, пондниʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: [пондандиʼ, пондндиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: [пондандиʼ, пондндиʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: пондваˮ
     поʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: пондраˮ
     поʼ+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: [пондадоʼ, понддоʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: пондваˮ
     поʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: [пондамдаˮ, пондмдаˮ]
     поʼ+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: [пондамдоʼ, пондмдоʼ]
     поʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: [понданаˮ, понднаˮ]
     поʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: [пондандаˮ, пондндаˮ]
     поʼ+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: [пондандоʼ, пондндоʼ]
     
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     поʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: пондмʼ
     поʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: понд
     поʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: поʼ
     поʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: пониʼ
     поʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: пондиʼ
     поʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: поӈгʼ
     поʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: помаˮ
     поʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: пондаˮ
     поʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: пойˮ  
     поʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: пондамзь
     поʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: пондась 
     поʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: понзь   
     поʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: понинзь
     поʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: пондинзь
     поʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: поӈганзь
     поʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: помаць 
     поʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: пондаць 
     поʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: пояць   
